Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 4. Isolation

§ 21-4-401.
Transportation or maintenance for isolated pupils.

The board of trustees of any school district within the state shall provide transportation or maintenance for isolated elementary, middle, junior high or high school pupils resident within the district, whenever it would be in the best interests of the affected children to provide transportation or maintenance than to establish a school to serve these pupils, and for those isolated pupils resident within the district who are attending a school in another district pursuant to W.S.

21-4-502

. Amounts paid under this section shall be subject to subsections (d) and (e) of this section and shall not exceed the actual costs incurred by parents or pupils.

The state superintendent shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations pertaining to residence requirements establishing eligibility under this section and for provision of tuition and transportation or maintenance. No person is eligible as an isolated pupil under this section unless the pupil’s parents or legal guardians demonstrate to the local school board that the family’s residing in the isolated location is necessary for the family’s financial well being. The burden shall be on the parent or guardian to demonstrate that the family’s residing in the isolated location is necessary for the family’s financial well being. The final decision as to eligibility shall be made by the district board of trustees.

The rights accorded under this section shall be enforceable by writ of mandamus, and in such event the district shall pay all costs and legal expenses of a petitioner successful in obtaining such writ.

To receive transportation payments under this section, the parent or legal guardian of any isolated pupil eligible under this section shall file a transportation reimbursement claim with the district on a form provided by the district specifying the total round trip miles traveled each day to and from the bus stop or the school, as applicable. The total round trip miles shall be multiplied by the applicable mileage rate prescribed under W.S. 9-3-103(a)(iii) to compute the daily mileage reimbursement amount. Where combined transportation is provided for two (2) or more isolated pupils being transported to the same school, only one (1) reimbursement shall be made. Payments to parents or guardians for transporting students to and from school shall be computed excluding the first two (2) miles traveled each way. No payments shall be paid to a parent or guardian for transportation of students unless the pupil resides in an isolated location as specified under subsection (b) of this section.

Monthly maintenance payments may be paid under this section in lieu of transportation payments if the pupil resides at a location near the school rather than the isolated location. The amount paid shall be the lesser of the amount of maintenance payments claimed or the transportation payments that would have been payable under subsection (d) of this section. Monthly maintenance payments under this section shall reimburse the isolated student’s parent or legal guardian for additional reasonable living expenses for only those months school is in session. A district shall be reimbursed for the full amount of isolation or maintenance payments it makes under this section. Reimbursement shall be made as if the district’s total foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p) was increased by the amount of isolation or maintenance payments made during the preceding year.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 17; Laws 1886, ch. 75, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 3927; Laws 1888, ch. 72, § 12; 1890, ch. 77, § 5; R.S. 1899, § 531; Laws 1903, ch. 63, § 1; 1905, ch. 91, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1935; C.S. 1920, § 2239; R.S. 1931, § 99-317; Laws 1933, ch. 136, § 1; 1937, ch. 35, § 1; 1941, ch. 45, § 1; 1943, ch. 10, § 1; 1945, ch. 138, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 67-607; Laws 1951, ch. 21, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-115; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 65; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-65; Laws 1971, ch. 164, § 1; 1994, ch. 17, § 1; ch. 53, § 1; 1999, ch. 110, § 104; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” in (b).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b), substituted “state superintendent” for “director” in the first sentence.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Cited

in

Clements v. Board of Trustees, 585 P.2d 197,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-4-402.
Instruction for hospitalized or homebound pupils.

The board of trustees of each school district shall offer homebound instruction for each pupil in the district who is hospitalized or homebound for more than one (1) week because of injury or illness.

The board shall also offer homebound instruction for each pupil in the district who is hospitalized or placed in a state accredited or state certified treatment facility for more than one (1) week in a hospital or facility located in another Wyoming school district because of injury or illness. The board shall either provide instruction directly or contract with the school district in which the pupil is hospitalized or placed in a facility to provide this instruction. This subsection does not apply to pupils who:

Are hospitalized or placed due to a mental, physical or psychological disability and who are receiving educational services under W.S.

21-2-501

; or

Have been placed in a psychiatric residential treatment facility who are receiving educational services pursuant to W.S.

21-13-315

or

21-13-336

.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 66; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-66; Laws 1989, ch. 260, § 1; 2016 ch. 89, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added (b)(i) designation, substituted “disability” for “handicap” in present (b)(i), added (b)(ii), and made stylistic changes.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

AIDS infection as affecting right to attend public school, 60 ALR4th 15.